Hawaii statutes.
[§103B-1] Definitions. As used
in this chapter:

"Construction" has the same meaning
as in section 103D-104.

"Contract" means contracts for
construction under chapter 103D.

"Contractor" has the same meaning as
in section 103D-104; provided that "contractor" includes a
subcontractor where applicable.

"Procurement officer" has the same
meaning as in section 103D-104.

"Resident" means a person who is
physically present in the State at the time the person claims to have
established the person's domicile in the State and shows the person's intent is
to make Hawaii the person's primary residence.

"Shortage trade" means a construction
trade in which there is a shortage of Hawaii residents qualified to work in the
trade. [L 2010, c 68, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next